Utah statutes.
76-7-301.1.   Preamble -- Findings and policies of Legislature.

(1)  It is the finding and policy of the Legislature, reflecting and reasserting the provisions of Article I, Sections 1 and 7, Utah Constitution, which recognize that life founded on inherent and inalienable rights is entitled to protection of law and due process; and that unborn children have inherent and inalienable rights that are entitled to protection by the state of Utah pursuant to the provisions of the Utah Constitution.

(2)  The state of Utah has a compelling interest in the protection of the lives of unborn children.

(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature to protect and guarantee to unborn children their inherent and inalienable right to life  as required by Article I, Sections 1 and 7, Utah Constitution.

(4)  It is also the policy of the Legislature and of the state that, in connection with abortion, a woman's liberty interest, in limited circumstances, may outweigh the unborn child's right to protection.   These limited circumstances arise when the abortion is necessary to save the pregnant woman's life or prevent grave damage to her medical health, and when pregnancy occurs as a result of rape or incest.   It is further the finding and policy of the Legislature and of the state that a woman may terminate the pregnancy if the unborn child would be born with grave  defects.



Amended by Chapter 2, 1991 Special Session 1

